test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-lex_nuora_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# â stems


  Adjective - nuorâ: # â-stems NUORA MLO checked, pos, comp + sup
    nuorâ+A+Sg+Nom: nuorâ
    nuorâ+A+Attr: nuorâ
    nuorâ+A+Sg+Gen: nuorâ
    nuorâ+A+Sg+Acc: nuorâ
    nuorâ+A+Sg+Ill: nuorân
    nuorâ+A+Sg+Loc: nuorâst
    nuorâ+A+Sg+Com: nuoráin
    nuorâ+A+Sg+Abe: nuorâttáá
    nuorâ+A+Ess: nuorrân
    nuorâ+A+Par: nuorrâd
    nuorâ+A+Pl+Nom: nuorah
    nuorâ+A+Pl+Gen: nuorâi
    nuorâ+A+Pl+Acc: nuorâid
    nuorâ+A+Pl+Ill: nuoráid
    nuorâ+A+Pl+Loc: nuorâin
    nuorâ+A+Pl+Com: nuorâiguin
    nuorâ+A+Pl+Abe: nuorâittáá
    
    nuorâ+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: nuorâb
    nuorâ+A+Comp+Attr: nuorâb # see below
    nuorâ+A+Comp+Sg+Gen: nuorâb # Nuorâbáá was correct but it is gen from nuorâbâš "a little younger"
    nuorâ+A+Comp+Sg+Acc: nuorâb
    nuorâ+A+Comp+Sg+Ill: nuorâbân
    nuorâ+A+Comp+Sg+Loc: nuorâbist
    nuorâ+A+Comp+Sg+Com: nuorâbáin
    nuorâ+A+Comp+Sg+Abe: nuorâbttáá
    nuorâ+A+Comp+Pl+Nom: nuorâbeh
    nuorâ+A+Comp+Pl+Gen: nuorâbij
    nuorâ+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: nuorâbijd
    nuorâ+A+Comp+Pl+Ill: nuorâbáid
    nuorâ+A+Comp+Pl+Loc: nuorâbijn
    nuorâ+A+Comp+Pl+Com: nuorâbijguin
    nuorâ+A+Comp+Pl+Abe: nuorâbijttáá
    nuorâ+A+Comp+Ess: nuorâbin
    nuorâ+A+Comp+Par: nuorâbid
    
    nuorâ+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: nuorâmus
    nuorâ+A+Superl+Attr: nuorâmus # see below
    nuorâ+A+Superl+Sg+Gen: nuorâmuu
    nuorâ+A+Superl+Sg+Acc: nuorâmuu
    nuorâ+A+Superl+Sg+Ill: nuorâmui
    nuorâ+A+Superl+Sg+Loc: nuorâmuust
    nuorâ+A+Superl+Sg+Com: nuorâmuin
    nuorâ+A+Superl+Sg+Abe: nuorâmuuttáá
    nuorâ+A+Superl+Pl+Nom: [nuorâmuuh, nuorâmusah]
    nuorâ+A+Superl+Pl+Gen: nuorâmui
    nuorâ+A+Superl+Pl+Acc: nuorâmuid
    nuorâ+A+Superl+Pl+Ill: nuorâmuid
    nuorâ+A+Superl+Pl+Loc: nuorâmuin
    nuorâ+A+Superl+Pl+Com: nuorâmuiguin
    nuorâ+A+Superl+Pl+Abe: nuorâmuittáá
    nuorâ+A+Superl+Ess: nuorâmussân
    nuorâ+A+Superl+Par: nuorâmussâd

# nuorâ+A+Comp+Attr: nuorâb
# nuorâ+A+Superl+Attr: nuorâmus

# Full congruence in sg:
# nuorâb / nuorâmus (sg nom): sg nom.
# nuorâb / nuorâmuu (sg gen): sg gen + sg acc
# nuorâbáin / nuorâmuin (sg com): sg com

# Half congruence:
# nuorâb / nuorâmus (sg nom): ess + par
# nuorâb / nuorâmuu (sg gen): sg ill + sg loc + sg abe

# Full congruence in pl:
# pl nom pl gen, pl acc, pl ill, pl loc

# Half congruence in pl: 
# nuorâbij / nuorâmui + Pl com + Pl abe
